Hawaii statutes.
[§304A-2687] Validation of proceedings. All
proceedings taken with respect to the contracting of revenue bonded
indebtedness and the issuance, sale, execution, and delivery of revenue bonds
by the board are deemed validated, ratified, approved, and confirmed,
notwithstanding any defects or irregularities in any proceedings or in the
issuance, execution, sale, or delivery. The revenue bonds so issued or to be
issued are and shall be valid obligations of the board. [L 2007, c 161, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next